Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4531.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9. (1) The department, in discharging its responsibilities under this act, shall provide, directly or through the purchase of services from other agencies and professions, multidisciplinary services such as those of a pediatrician, psychologist, psychiatrist, public health nurse, social worker, or attorney through the establishment of regionally based or strategically located teams. The department shall prepare a biennial report to the legislature containing information on the activities of the teams created pursuant according to this subsection and including recommendations by the teams and the department regarding child abuse and or child neglect when committed by persons a person responsible for the child's health or welfare. (2) The department shall assure ensure a continuing education program for department, probate court, and private agency personnel. The program shall include responsibilities, obligations, and powers under this act and the diagnosis and treatment of child abuse and or child neglect when committed by persons a person responsible for the child's health or welfare. (3) The department shall provide for the dissemination of information to the general public with respect to the problem of child abuse and child neglect in this state and the facilities, prevention, and treatment methods available to combat child abuse and or child neglect when committed by persons a person responsible for the child's health or welfare. (4) All individuals required to report child abuse or child neglect under section 3 must complete, once every 3 years, training developed by the department in recognizing child abuse and child neglect and in mandated reporting obligations. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00492'25) or House Bill No. 4530 (request no. H00492'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.